California statutes. Civil Code
The lender of a thing for use must indemnify the borrower for damage caused by defects or vices in it, which he knew at the time of lending, and concealed from the borrower.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1894.

The lender of a thing for use may at any time require its return, even though he lent it for a specified time or purpose. But if, on the faith of such an agreement, the borrower has made such arrangements that a return of the thing before the period agreed upon would cause him loss, exceeding the benefit derived by him from the loan, the lender must indemnify him for such loss, if he compels such return, the borrower not having in any manner violated his duty.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1895.

If a thing is lent for use for a specified time or purpose, it must be returned to the lender without demand, as soon as the time has expired, or the purpose has been accomplished. In other cases it need not be returned until demanded.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1896.

The borrower of a thing for use must return it to the lender, at the place contemplated by the parties at the time of lending; or if no particular place was so contemplated by them, then at the place where it was at that time.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Loans to Museums for Indefinite or Long Terms [1899. - 1899.11.]

1899.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) Many museums have benefited greatly from having property loaned to them for study or display. Problems have arisen, however, in connection with loans for indefinite or long terms, when museums and lenders have failed to maintain contact. Many of these problems could be avoided by a clarification and regularization of the rights and obligations of the parties to loans for indefinite or long terms.

(b) An existing law, the Unclaimed Property Law (commencing with Section 1500 of
the Code of Civil Procedure), is technically applicable to property on loan to a museum which has been left unclaimed by its owner for at least seven years. 

(c) While the Unclaimed Property Law addresses problems similar to those which arise in the museum context when the parties to loans fail to maintain contact, there is need for an alternative method of dealing with unclaimed property in the hands of museums, one tailored to the unique circumstances of unclaimed loans to museums. These circumstances include the likelihood that the unclaimed property has significant scientific, historical, aesthetic, or cultural value but does not have great monetary value; that the public’s interest in the intangible values of unclaimed property loaned to museums can best be realized if title is transferred to the museums holding the property; that often lenders intend eventually to donate property but place it on indefinite or long term loan initially for
tax and other reasons; and that many museums have incurred unreimbursed expenses in caring for and storing unclaimed loaned property.

(d) There is an inherent tendency for the condition of tangible property to change over time. Loaned property often requires conservation work and conservation measures may be expensive or potentially detrimental to the property. Organic materials and specimens may serve as breeding grounds for insects, fungi, or diseases which threaten other more valuable property.

(e) Museums cannot reasonably be expected to make decisions regarding conservation or disposition of loaned property at their own risk and expense. Over time, however, lenders die or move, and museums and lenders lose contact. If a lender has failed to maintain contact with a museum, it is often impossible to locate the lender so that the lender can make decisions regarding conservation
or disposition of loaned property.

(f) Since museums rarely relocate, it is easier for lenders, and those who claim through them, to notify museums of address or ownership changes so that museums can readily contact lenders when decisions must be made regarding conservation or disposition of loaned property.

(g) The best evidence of ownership of property on loan to a museum is generally the original loan receipt. The longer property remains on loan, the less likely it is that the original lender will claim it, and the more likely it is that any claim which is made will be made by someone who does not have the original loan receipt or other clear evidence of ownership. The state has a substantial interest in cutting off stale and uncertain claims to tangible personal property loaned to nonprofit and public museums.

(h) Most of the tangible personal property which escheats to the state under the Unclaimed Property Law is found in safe deposit boxes. Although 40–50 percent of the intangible property which escheats to the state is subsequently claimed, less than 1 percent of escheated tangible personal property is claimed. Of the few claims which are presented to the Controller for tangible personal property, most are presented within two years of the date the Controller gives notice of the escheat.

(i) The public interest is served by requiring lenders to notify museums of changes in address or ownership of loaned property, by establishing a uniform procedure for lenders to preserve their interests in property loaned to museums for indefinite or long terms, and by vesting title to unclaimed property on loan to museums in the museums which have custody of the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.1.

For the purposes of this chapter:

(a) A “museum” is an institution located in California and operated by a nonprofit corporation or public agency, primarily educational, scientific, or aesthetic in purpose, which owns, borrows, or cares for, and studies, archives, or exhibits property.

(b) A “lender’s address” is the most recent address as shown on the museum’s records pertaining to the property on loan from the lender.

(c) The terms “loan,” “loaned,” and “on
loan” include all deposits of property with a museum which are not accompanied by a transfer of title to the property.

(d) “Property” includes all tangible objects, animate and inanimate, under a museum’s care which have intrinsic value to science, history, art, or culture, except that it does not include botanical or zoological specimens loaned to a museum for scientific research purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.2.

(a) When a museum is required to give a lender notice pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the museum shall be deemed to have given a lender notice if the museum mails the notice to the lender at the lender’s address and proof of receipt is received by the museum within 30 days from the date the notice was mailed. If the museum does not have an address for the lender, or if proof of receipt is not received by the museum, notice shall be deemed given if the museum publishes notice at least once a week for three successive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in both the county in which the museum is located and the
county of the lender’s address, if any.

(b) In addition to any other information prescribed in this chapter, notices given pursuant to it shall contain the lender’s name, the lender’s address, if known, the date of the loan and, if the notice is being given by the museum, the name, address, and telephone number of the appropriate office or official to be contacted at the museum for information regarding the loan.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a museum is “located” in the county of a branch of the museum to which a loan is made. In all other instances, a museum is located in the county in which it has its principal place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.3.

(a) If, on or after January 1, 1984, a museum accepts a loan of property for an indefinite term, or for a term in excess of seven years, the museum shall inform the lender in writing at the time of the loan of the provisions of this chapter. A copy of the form notice prescribed in Section 1899.5, or a citation to this chapter, is adequate for this purpose.

(b) Unless the loaned property is returned to the claimant, the museum shall retain for a period of not less than 25 years the original or an accurate copy of each notice filed by a claimant pursuant to Section
1899.4.

(c) The museum shall furnish anyone who files a notice of intent to preserve an interest in property on loan proof of receipt of the notice by mailing an original receipt or a copy of the receipt portion of the form notice prescribed in Section 1899.5 to the lender or other claimant at the address given on the notice within 30 days of receiving the notice.

(d) A museum shall give a lender prompt notice of any known injury to or loss of property on loan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.4.

(a) It is the responsibility of the owner of property on loan to a museum to notify the museum promptly in writing of any change of address or change in ownership of the property. Failure to notify the museum of these changes may result in the owner’s loss of rights in the property.

(b) The owner of property on loan to a museum may file with the museum a notice of intent to preserve an interest in the property as provided for in Section 1899.5. The filing of a notice of intent to preserve an interest in property on loan to a museum does not validate or make
enforceable any claim which would be extinguished under the terms of a written loan agreement, or which would otherwise be invalid or unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.5.

(a) A notice of intent to preserve an interest in property on loan to a museum filed pursuant to this chapter shall be in writing, shall contain a description of the property adequate to enable the museum to identify the property, shall be accompanied by documentation sufficient to establish the claimant as owner of the property, and shall be signed under penalty of perjury by the claimant or by a person authorized to act on behalf of the claimant.

(b) The museum need not retain a notice that does not meet the requirements set forth in subdivision (a). If, however, the museum does not intend to retain a notice for this reason, the museum shall promptly
 notify the claimant at the address given on the notice that it believes the notice is ineffective to preserve an interest, and the reasons therefor. The fact that the museum retains a notice shall not be construed to mean that the museum accepts the sufficiency or accuracy of the notice or that the notice is effective to preserve an interest in property on loan to the museum.

(c) A notice of intent to preserve an interest in property on loan to a museum which is in substantially the following form, and contains the information and attachments described, satisfies the requirements of subdivision (a):

NOTICE OF INTENT TO PRESERVE AN INTEREST IN PROPERTY ON LOAN TO A MUSEUM
TO THE LENDER: Section 1899.4 of the California Civil Code requires that you notify the museum promptly in writing of any change of address or ownership of the property. If the museum is unable to contact you regarding your loan, you may lose rights in the loaned property. If you choose to file this form with the museum to preserve your interest in the property, the museum is required to maintain it, or a copy of it, for 25 years. For full details, see Section 1899, et seq. of the California Civil Code.

TO THE MUSEUM: You are hereby notified that the undersigned claims an interest in the property described herein.

ClaimantName:Address:Telephone:Social Security Number (optional):Museum Name:Date Property Loaned:Interest in Property:If you are not the original lender, describe the origin of your interest in the property and attach a copy of any document creating your interest:Description of Property:Unless an accurate, legible copy of the original loan receipt is attached, give a detailed description of the claimed property, including its nature and general characteristics and the museum registration number assigned to the property, if known, and attach any documentary evidence you have establishing the loan:Registration #Description: (Attach additional sheets if necessary.)I understand that I must promptly notify the museum in writing of any change of address or change in ownership of the loaned property.I declare under penalty of perjury that to the best of my knowledge the information contained in this notice is true.Signed: ________________ Date:(claimant)ORI declare under penalty of perjury that I am authorized to act on behalf of the claimant and am informed and believe that the information contained in this notice is true.Signed: ______________________ Date:(claimant’s representative)RECEIPT FOR NOTICE OF INTENT
TO PRESERVE AN INTEREST IN PROPERTY(For use by the museum.)Notice received by:Date of receipt:Copy of receipt returned to claimant:ByDate: (d) Notices of intent to preserve an interest in property on loan to a museum filed pursuant to this chapter are exempt from the disclosure requirements of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 50.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.6.

(a) Unless there is a written loan agreement to the contrary, a museum may apply conservation measures to or dispose of property on loan to the museum without a lender’s permission if:

(1) Immediate action is required to protect the property on loan or to protect other property in the custody of the museum, or because the property on loan has become a hazard to the health and safety of the public or of the museum’s staff, and:

(A) The museum is unable to reach the lender at the lender’s last address of
record so that the museum and the lender can promptly agree upon a solution; or 

(B) The lender will not agree to the protective measures the museum recommends, yet is unwilling or unable to terminate the loan and retrieve the property.

(2) In the case of a lender who cannot be contacted in person, the museum publishes a notice containing the information described in subdivision (a) of Section 1899.7 and there is no response for 120 days.

(b) If a museum applies conservation measures to or disposes of property pursuant to subdivision (a):

(1) The museum shall have a lien on the property and on the proceeds from any disposition thereof for the costs incurred by the museum; and

(2) The
museum shall not be liable for injury to or loss of the property:

(A) If the museum had a reasonable belief at the time the action was taken that the action was necessary to protect the property on loan or other property in the custody of the museum, or that the property on loan constituted a hazard to the health and safety of the public or the museum’s staff; and

(B) If the museum applied conservation measures, the museum exercised reasonable care in the choice and application of the conservation measures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if a museum is unable to give the lender the notice required by subdivision (d) of Section 1899.3 of injury to or loss of property on loan by mail, the museum shall be deemed to have given the lender notice of any injury or loss if in addition to the information required by subdivision (b) of Section 1899.2 the published notice includes a statement containing substantially the following information:“The records of (name of museum)indicate that you have property on loan to it. Your failure to notify it in writing of a change of address or ownership of property on loan or to contact it in writing regarding the loan may result in the loss of rights in the loaned property. See California Civil Code Sections 1899, et seq.”(b) If, within three years of giving notice of injury to or loss of loaned property by publishing the notice set forth in subdivision (a), the museum receives a notice from a claimant pursuant to Section 1899.4, the museum shall promptly advise the claimant in writing of the nature of the injury to or the fact of the loss of property on loan and
the approximate date thereof. For the purposes of the limitation period in Section 1899.8, if the museum mails the information to the claimant within 30 days of the date the museum receives the notice from the claimant, the museum shall be deemed to have given the claimant notice of the injury to or loss of property on loan on the date notice by publication pursuant to subdivision (a) was completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.8.

Effective January 1, 1985, no action shall be brought against a museum for damages because of injury to or loss of property loaned to the museum more than (1) three years from the date the museum gives the lender notice of the injury or loss, or (2) ten years from the date of the injury or loss, whichever occurs earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.9.

(a) A museum may give the lender notice of the museum’s intent to terminate a loan which was made for an indefinite term, or which was made on or after January 1, 1984, for a term in excess of seven years.

A notice of intent to terminate a loan given pursuant to this section shall include a statement containing substantially the following information:“The records of (name of museum)indicate that you have property on loan to it. The institution wishes to terminate the loan. You must contact the institution, establish your ownership of the property, and make arrangements to collect the property. If you fail to do so promptly, you will be deemed to have donated the property to the institution. See California Civil Code Sections 1899, et seq.”(b) For the purposes of this chapter, a loan for a specified term becomes a loan for an indefinite term if the property remains in the custody of the museum when the specified term expires.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.10.

(a) The three-year limitation on actions to recover personal property prescribed in Code of Civil Procedure Section 338.3 shall run from the date the museum gives the lender notice of its intent to terminate the loan pursuant to Section 1899.9.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (e), effective January 1, 1985, no action shall be brought against a museum to recover property on loan when more than 25 years have passed from the date of the last written contact between the lender and the museum, as evidenced in the museum’s records.

(c) A lender shall be deemed to have donated loaned property to a museum if the lender fails to file an action to recover the property on loan to the museum within the periods specified in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) One who purchases property from a museum acquires good title to the property if the museum represents that it has acquired title to the property pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), a lender who was not given notice that the museum intended to terminate a loan and who proves that the museum received a notice of intent to preserve an interest in loaned property within the 25 years immediately preceding the date on which the lender’s right to recover the property otherwise expired under subdivision (b) may recover the property or, if the property has been disposed of,
the reasonable value of the property at the time the property was disposed of with interest at the rate on judgments set by the Legislature pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 541, Sec. 1.   Effective July 17, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

1899.11.

(a) The provisions of this chapter supersede the provisions of the Unclaimed Property Law (commencing with Section 1500 of the Code of Civil Procedure) except that at its option, a museum may report property which has been on loan unclaimed by its owner for more than seven years to the Controller pursuant to Section 1530 of the Code of Civil Procedure for disposition in accordance with the provisions of the Unclaimed Property Law.

(b) Not less than six months or more than 12 months before reporting any loaned property to the Controller, a museum shall mail to the
lender at the lender’s address, if known, a notice of intent to report the property to the Controller. The notice shall include a statement containing substantially the following information:“The records of (name of museum)indicate that you have property on loan to the institution. The institution wishes to terminate the loan. You must contact the institution, establish your ownership of the property and make arrangements to collect the property before (fill in date) or the property will be disposed of in accordance with the provisions of the Unclaimed Property Law (commencing with Section 1500 of the Code of Civil
Procedure).”

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Loan for Exchange [1902. - 1906.]

1902.

A loan for exchange is a contract by which one delivers personal property to another, and the latter agrees to return to the lender a similar thing at a future time, without reward for its use.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1903.

A loan, which the borrower is allowed by the lender to treat as a loan for use, or for exchange, at his option, is subject to all the provisions of this Chapter.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.

By a loan for exchange the title to the thing lent is transferred to the borrower, and he must bear all its expenses, and is entitled to all its increase.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.

A lender for exchange cannot require the borrower to fulfill his obligations at a time, or in a manner, different from that which was originally agreed upon.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1906.

Sections 1893, 1895, and 1896, apply to a loan for exchange.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Loan of Money [1912. - 1916.12.]

1912.

A loan of money is a contract by which one delivers a sum of money to another, and the latter agrees to return at a future time a sum equivalent to that which he borrowed. A loan for mere use is governed by the Chapter on Loan for Use.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1913.

A borrower of money, unless there is an express contract to the contrary, must pay the amount due in such money as is current at the time when the loan becomes due, whether such money is worth more or less than the actual money lent.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

[1914.]

Section Nineteen Hundred and Fourteen. Whenever a loan of money is made, it is presumed to be made upon interest, unless it is otherwise expressly stipulated at the time in writing.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

[1915.]

Section Nineteen Hundred and Fifteen. Interest is the compensation allowed by law or fixed by the parties for the use, or forbearance, or detention of money.

(History: Amended by Code Amendments 1873-74, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.

When a rate of interest is prescribed by a law or contract, without specifying the period of time by which such rate is to be calculated, it is to be deemed an annual rate.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.1.

The restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not apply to any loan, or any forbearance, extension, or modification of a loan, made or arranged by any person licensed as a real estate broker by the State of California, and secured, directly or collaterally, in whole or in part by liens on real property. For purposes of this section, a loan, or forbearance, extension, or modification of a loan, is arranged by a person licensed as a real estate broker when a broker (1) acts for compensation or in expectation of compensation for soliciting, negotiating, or arranging the loan, or forbearance, extension, or modification of the loan, for another, (2) acts for
 compensation or in expectation of compensation for selling, buying, leasing, exchanging, or negotiating the sale, purchase, lease, or exchange of real property or a business for another and (A) arranges a loan to pay all or any portion of the purchase price of, or of an improvement to, that property or business or (B) arranges a forbearance, extension, modification, or refinancing of any loan in connection with that sale, purchase, lease, exchange of, or an improvement to, real property or a business, or (3) arranges or negotiates for another a forbearance, extension, modification, or refinancing of any loan secured by real property in connection with a past transaction in which a broker had acted for compensation or in expectation of compensation for selling, buying, leasing, exchanging, or negotiating the sale, purchase, lease, or exchange of real property or a business. The term “made or
 arranged” includes any loan, or any forbearance, extension, or modification of a loan, made by a person licensed as a real estate broker as a principal or as an agent for others, and whether or not the person is acting within the course and scope of such license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 601, Sec. 1.   (SB 1146)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.2.

The restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution do not apply to any loans made by, or forbearances of, a public retirement or pension system that is created, authorized, and regulated by the laws of a state other than California, or the laws of a local agency of a state other than California.

This section establishes as an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution, any public retirement or pension system that is created, authorized, and regulated by the laws of a state other than California, or the laws
of a local agency of a state other than California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 764, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.5.

(a) No increase in interest provided for in any provision for a variable interest rate contained in a security document, or evidence of debt issued in connection therewith, by a lender other than a supervised financial organization is valid unless that provision is set forth in the security document, and in any evidence of debt issued in connection therewith, and the document or documents contain the following provisions:

(1) A requirement that when an increase in the interest rate is required or permitted by a movement in a particular direction of a prescribed standard an identical decrease is required in the interest rate by a movement in the opposite direction of the prescribed standard.

(2) The
 rate of interest shall not change more often than once during any semiannual period, and at least six months shall elapse between any two changes.

(3) The change in the interest rate shall not exceed one-fourth of 1 percent in any semiannual period, and shall not result in a rate more than 2.5 percentage points greater than the rate for the first loan payment due after the closing of the loan.

(4) The rate of interest shall not change during the first semiannual period.

(5) The borrower is permitted to prepay the loan in whole or in part without a prepayment charge within 90 days of notification of any increase in the rate of interest.

(6) A statement attached to the security document and to any evidence of debt issued in connection therewith printed or
 written in a size equal to at least 10-point boldface type, consisting of the following language:
NOTICE TO BORROWER: THIS DOCUMENT CONTAINS PROVISIONS FOR A VARIABLE INTEREST RATE.
(b) (1) This section shall be applicable only to a mortgage contract, deed of trust, real estate sales contract, or any note or negotiable instrument issued in connection therewith, when its purpose is to finance the purchase or construction of real property containing four or fewer residential units or on which four or fewer residential units are to be constructed.

(2) This section does not apply to unamortized construction loans with an original term of two years or less or to loans made for the purpose of the purchase or construction of improvements to
 existing residential dwellings.

(c) Regulations setting forth the prescribed standard upon which variations in the interest rate shall be based may be adopted by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation with respect to savings associations and by the Insurance Commissioner with respect to insurers. Regulations adopted by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation shall apply to all loans made by savings associations pursuant to this section before January 1, 1990.

(d) As used in this section:

(1) “Supervised financial organization” means a state or federally regulated bank, savings association, savings bank, or credit union, or state regulated industrial loan company, a licensed finance lender under the California Financing Law, a licensed residential mortgage lender under the California
 Residential Mortgage Lending Act, or holding company, affiliate, or subsidiary thereof, or institution of the Farm Credit System, as specified in Section 2002 of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(2) “Insurer” includes, but is not limited to, a nonadmitted insurance company.

(3) “Semiannual period” means each of the successive periods of six calendar months commencing with the first day of the calendar month in which the instrument creating the obligation is dated.

(4) “Security document” means a mortgage contract, deed of trust, or real estate sales contract.

(5) “Evidence of debt” means a note or negotiable instrument.

(e) This section is applicable only to instruments executed on and
 after the effective date of this section.

(f) This section does not apply to nonprofit public corporations.

(g) This section is not intended to apply to a loan made where the rate of interest provided for is less than the then current market rate for a similar loan in order to accommodate the borrower because of a special relationship, including, but not limited to, an employment or business relationship, of the borrower with the lender or with a customer of the lender and the sole increase in interest provided for with respect to the loan will result only by reason of the termination of that relationship or upon the sale, deed, or transfer of the property securing the loan to a person not having that relationship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 27.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.6.

A security document, or evidence of debt issued in connection therewith, executed pursuant to Section 1916.5 may provide that the rate of interest shall not change until five years after execution of such document or documents, and not more frequently than every five years thereafter. In every security document, or evidence of debt issued in connection therewith, executed pursuant to this section all the provisions of Section 1916.5 shall be applicable, except those provisions specifying the frequency of interest rate changes and limiting rate changes to one-fourth of 1 percent in any semiannual period. For the purposes of this section “five years” means each of the
successive periods of five years commencing with the first day of the calendar month in which the instrument creating the obligation is dated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 575.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.7.

(a) Sections 1916.5, 1916.6, 1916.8, and 1916.9 of the Civil Code, and any other provision of law restricting or setting forth requirements for changes in the rate of interest on loans, shall not be applicable to loans made pursuant to this section.

(b) A mortgage loan made pursuant to the provisions of this section is an adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate loan, on the security of real property occupied or intended to be occupied by the borrower containing four or fewer residential units and incorporating terms substantially as follows:

(1) The term of the loan shall be not less than 29 years, repayable in monthly installments amortized over a period of not less than 30 years.

(2) Monthly payments may be adjusted to reflect changes in the variable interest rate of the loan. Changes in interest and monthly payment shall not occur more often than twice during any annual period and at least six months shall elapse between any two changes. The rate of interest and monthly payments shall not change during the first semiannual period. The amount of any increase in monthly payment shall not exceed 7.5 percent annually.

(3) Monthly payments may also be established on a graduated basis within the parameters of a loan originated pursuant to the provisions of this section. A graduated payment adjustable mortgage loan shall meet all the requirements of this
section and shall set forth in the note, at the time of origination, limitations on the rate of increase in the scheduled payments due both to graduation and to changes in the interest rate.

(4) Whenever any monthly installment is less than the amount of interest accrued during the month with respect to which the installment is payable, the borrower shall have the option to select one, or any combination of, the following: 

(A) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), increase the monthly installment in an amount which at least covers the increase in interest.

(B) Have the difference added to the principal of the loan as of the due date of the installment and thereafter shall bear interest as part of the principal. In no instance shall the difference which is added to the principal be an amount which causes
the resulting loan-to-value ratio to exceed the loan-to-value ratio at the time of loan origination.

(C) Extend the term of the loan up to, but not exceeding, 40 years.

(5) Changes in the rate of interest on the loan shall reflect the movement, in reference to the date of the original loan, of a periodically published index selected by the lender which may be either of the following:

(A) The contract interest rate on the purchase of previously occupied homes in the most recent monthly national average mortgage rate index for all major lenders published periodically by the Federal Home Loan Bank Board.

(B) The weighted average cost of funds for California Associations of the Eleventh District Savings and Loan Associations as published periodically by the
Federal Home Loan Bank of San Francisco.

(6) Any change in the interest rate shall not exceed the limit, specified by the lender in the loan contract, for rate increases in any semiannual period and shall not exceed the limit, specified by the lender in the loan contract, for rate increases greater than the base index rate.

(7) Notwithstanding any change in the interest rate indicated by a movement of the index, increases in the interest rate shall be optional with the lender, while decreases are mandatory. Such decreases, upon the option of the borrower, shall be used (1) to pay off any negative amortization accrued when the interest rate was increased, or (2) to decrease the monthly payment as reflected in the decrease in the interest rate.

(8) The borrower is permitted to prepay the loan in whole or in part
without a prepayment charge at any time, and no fee or other charge may be required by the lender of the borrower as a result of any change in the interest rate or the exercise of any option or election extended to the borrower pursuant to this section.

(9) The borrower, after initiation of the loan, shall not be subsequently required to demonstrate his or her qualification for the loan, except that this paragraph shall not limit any remedy available to the lender by law for default or other breach of contract.

(10) In the event the remaining principal due on a loan made pursuant to this section will not be paid off during the current term, within 90 days of expiration of the term a borrower may elect in writing to repay the remaining balance in full or in substantially equal installments of principal and interest over an additional period not to exceed 10 years, during which
period the interest rate shall remain fixed.

(c) An applicant for a loan originated pursuant to the provisions of this section must be given, at the time he or she requests an application, a disclosure notice in the following form: 
NOTICE TO BORROWER
IMPORTANT INFORMATION ABOUT THE ADJUSTABLE-PAYMENT, ADJUSTABLE-RATE LOAN
PLEASE READ CAREFULLY(at least 10-point bold type)
You have received an application form for an adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage loan. This loan may differ from other
mortgages with which you are familiar. 
I. GENERAL DESCRIPTION OF ADJUSTABLE-PAYMENT, ADJUSTABLE-RATE LOAN
The adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage loan is a flexible loan instrument. This means that the interest, monthly payment and/or the length of the loan may be changed during the course of the loan contract.

The first flexible feature of this loan is the interest rate. The interest rate on the loan may be changed by the lender every six months. Changes in the interest rate must reflect the movement of an index that is selected by the lender. Changes in the interest rate may result in increases or decreases in your monthly payment, in the outstanding principal loan balance, in the loan term, or in all three.

The lender is
required by law to limit the amount that the interest can change at any one time or over the life of the loan. The law does not specify what these limits are. That is a matter you should negotiate with the lender.

You may also want to make inquiries concerning the lending terms offered by other lenders on adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage loans to compare the terms and conditions.

Another flexible feature of the adjustable-payment, adjustable-rate mortgage loan is the monthly payment. The amount of the monthly payment may be increased or decreased by the lender every six months to reflect the changes in the interest rate. State law prohibits the lender from increasing your monthly payment by more than 7.5 percent per year. There may be circumstances, however, in which you, the borrower, may want to increase the amount of your monthly payment beyond the 7.5 percent limit. This option would be available to you
whenever changes in the interest rate threaten to increase the outstanding principal loan balance on the loan.
